Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2908
Fees.

Disclosure of personal information required or permitted under section 60-2906 or 60-2907 shall be subject to payment by the requester to the department of all fees for the information prescribed by statute.

Laws 1997, LB 635, § 8.